Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.4 Check Cashing

19-14.4-1.
Exemptions from licensing.

No license to cash checks shall be required of any:

Regulated institution, bank, or credit union organized under the laws of the United States, or subject to written notice with a designated Rhode Island agent for service of process in the form prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee, of any other state within the United States if the laws of the other state in which such bank or credit union is organized authorizes under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution or credit union to engage in the business of cashing checks in the other state; no bank or credit union duly organized under the laws of another state within the United States may receive deposits, pay checks or lend money from any location within this state unless such bank or credit union has received approval from the director, or the director’s designee, for the establishment of an interstate branch office pursuant to chapter 7 of title 19;

Natural person employee who is employed by a licensee when acting on the licensee’s behalf; or

Persons engaged in the business of cashing checks where that business is incidental to the person’s retail sale of goods or services and the person charges not more than fifty cents ($.50) per check cashed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56; P.L. 2003, ch. 163, § 5; P.L. 2003, ch. 169, § 5.

19-14.4-2.
Public notice of application.

Upon the filing of any application in due form, accompanied by the required fee and documents, notice thereof shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in this state. Each notice shall contain:

The name of the applicant;

The location of the proposed site; and

A statement that any comment or objection by anyone in relation to the application should be submitted in writing to the director, or the director’s designee, for consideration within ten (10) business days of the date of publication.

The general assembly finds and declares that check-cashing businesses provide important and vital services to Rhode Island citizens; that the number of check-cashing businesses should be limited in accordance with the needs of the communities they are to serve; and that it is in the public interest to promote and foster check-cashing businesses and to insure their financial stability.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall cause an investigation of the needs of the community for the establishment of a check-cashing business at the location specified in the application and the effect that granting the license will have on the financial stability of other check-cashing businesses that may be serving the community in which the business of the applicant is proposed to be conducted. If the issuance of a license to engage in the check-cashing business at the location specified will not promote the needs and the convenience and advantage of the community in which the check-cashing business of the applicant is proposed to be conducted, then the application may be denied.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall investigate to ascertain whether the qualifications and requirements have been met. Within ninety (90) days after the publication of the notice, if the director, or the director’s designee, finds that the qualifications have been met, he or she shall issue to the applicant a license to engage in the business of cashing checks in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.

19-14.4-3.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, is authorized, directed, and empowered to promulgate regulations that provide for the safety and security of customers of the licensee, and/or its employees, from robbery or other criminal activities to include, but not be limited to, bulletproof glass and steel partitions, except as provided in subsection (c).

The rules and regulations, in addition to any other provisions as the director, or the director’s designee, may require, must provide that licensees maintain:

Continuously, for each licensed premises, liquid assets of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

A cash sheet that must be prepared daily for each day’s business reflecting all transactions for that day;

A money-order register recording the date issued, money order number, amount, and date paid. In lieu of the money-order register, a copy of the money order may be kept when carbonized type money orders are used;

Insurance issued by an insurance company or indemnity company, authorized to do business under the laws of this state, that shall insure the applicant against loss by theft, burglary, robbery, or forgery in principal sum, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, that shall in no event be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), nor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The required amounts shall bear a relationship to the liquid assets on hand at the licensed location; and

An adequate written policy and affirmative program to ensure compliance with state and federal money laundering statutes.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) or any rule or regulation promulgated by the department of business regulation pertaining to check cashers, persons hosting state-operated video lottery games, and state-operated casino gaming pursuant to licenses issued by the department of business regulation, division of gaming and athletics, and the department of revenue, division of lotteries, are and shall be exempt from any requirement that they construct and maintain bulletproof glass and steel partitions at check cashing stations, transaction windows, counters and/or similar areas, whether or not an exchange of funds, checks, money orders, or other transactions take place therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56; P.L. 2019, ch. 289, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 303, § 2.

19-14.4-4.
Fees for services.

No licensee shall:

Charge check-cashing fees in excess of three percent (3%) of the face amount of the check, or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater, if the check is the payment of any kind of state public assistance or federal social security benefit;

Charge check-cashing fees for personal checks in excess of ten percent (10%) of the face amount of the personal check or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater;

Charge check-cashing fees in excess of five percent (5%) of the face amount of the check or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater, for all other checks; or

Charge deferred deposit transaction fees in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of funds advanced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56; P.L. 2001, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 204, § 1.

19-14.4-5.
Posting of charges — Endorsement — Receipt.

In every location licensed pursuant to this chapter, there shall be at all times posted, in a conspicuous place within the licensed premises, a complete and unambiguous schedule of all fees for cashing checks, deferred deposit transactions expressed as both a dollar amount and an annual percentage rate, and the initial issuance of any identification card.

Before a licensee shall deposit, with any regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution organized under the laws of the United States, a check cashed by the licensee, the check must be endorsed with the name under which the licensee is doing business and must include the words “licensed check cashing services”.

The licensee shall provide a receipt for each transaction for the benefit of a customer.

Each check casher shall also post a list of valid identification that is acceptable in lieu of identification provided by the check casher. The information required by this section shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half (1/2) inch in height. The information shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the unobstructed view of the public within the check casher’s premises. Failure to post information as required by this section, or the imposition of fees or identification requirements contrary to the information posted, shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56; P.L. 2001, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 235, § 1.

19-14.4-5.1.
Customer checks — Deferred deposits.

A check casher may defer the deposit of a personal check written by a customer for a term of no less than thirteen (13) days, pursuant to the provisions of this section. The face amount of the check shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

Each deferred deposit shall be made pursuant to a written agreement that has been signed by the customer and by the check casher or an authorized representative of the check casher. The written agreement shall contain a statement of the total amount of any fees charged for the deferred deposit, expressed both in United States currency and as an annual percentage rate (APR), as required by federal regulations. The written agreement shall authorize the check casher to defer deposit of the personal check until a specific date no less than thirteen (13) days from the date the written agreement was signed and executed. The written agreement shall not permit the check casher to accept collateral.

A rollover is an extension or deferral of the payment due date of a deferred deposit transaction for the payment of only an additional fee.

The maximum amount of a single customer’s check is five hundred dollars ($500).

The maximum aggregate amount of concurrently outstanding checks held by the licensee or its affiliate from the same customer is five hundred dollars ($500).

The maximum number of concurrently outstanding checks held by the licensee or its affiliates from the same customer is three (3).

The maximum number of rollovers permitted is one.

The check casher shall give a duplicate original of the agreement to the customer at the time of the transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 371, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 235, § 1.

19-14.4-6.
Securities in lieu of bonds.

In lieu of the required surety bond or bonds, or of any portion as required by chapter 14, the applicant may deposit with the director, or the director’s designee, or with any financial institutions, credit unions, or national banks in this state that the applicant may designate and the director, or the director’s designee, may approve, United States government/agency obligation or state obligations, to an aggregate amount, based upon principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, of not less than the amount of the required surety bond. The securities shall be deposited and held to secure the same obligations as would the surety bond, but the licensee shall be entitled to receive all interest and dividends thereon; shall have the right, with the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, to substitute other securities for those deposited; and shall be required to substitute securities on the written order of the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.

19-14.4-7.
Dishonor of check — Procedure.

Within five (5) business days after being advised by the payor institution that a check has been altered, forged, stolen, obtained through fraudulent or illegal means, negotiated without proper legal authority, or represents the proceeds of illegal activity, the licensee shall notify the police department in the city or town where the office of the licensee where the check was cashed is located. In the event a check is returned to the licensee by the payor institution for any of the aforementioned reasons, the licensee may not release the check without the consent of the city or town police department, office of the attorney general, or other investigating law enforcement authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.

19-14.4-8.
Food stamps — Distribution.

Check-cashing licensees may engage in the distribution of food stamps in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.

19-14.4-9.
Unlicensed check cashing businesses.

The operation of any unlicensed check-cashing businesses, or the unlawful conduct or operation of any licensed check-cashing business, is declared to constitute unfair competition with licensed and legally operated check-cashing businesses doing business in the same community. A licensee operating legally under this chapter in the same community has the right to apply to the superior court to obtain an injunction restraining this unfair competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.

19-14.4-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 56.